Maryland, session 2025, HB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
10–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) [(1)] “1.3 G fireworks” means special fireworks:
(1) designed primarily to produce visible or audible effects by combustion
or explosion[.];
[(2) “1.3 G fireworks” includes:
(i) toy torpedoes, railway torpedoes, firecrackers and salutes that do
not qualify as 1.4 G fireworks, exhibition display pieces, illuminating projectiles, incendiary
projectiles, and incendiary grenades;
(ii) smoke projectiles or bombs containing expelling charges but
without bursting charges;
(iii) flash powders in inner units not exceeding 2 ounces each, flash
sheets in interior packages, and flash powder or spreader cartridges containing an amount
not exceeding 72 grains of flash powder each; and
(iv) flash cartridges consisting of a paper cartridge shell, small arms
primer, and flash composition, not exceeding 180 grains, all assembled in one piece.]
(2) THAT MEET THE FEDERAL REGULATIONS FOR 1.3 G FIREWORKS;
AND
(3) THAT COMPLY WITH THE CONSTRUCTION, PERFORMANCE,
COMPOSITION, AND LABELING REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE CONSUMER
PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION IN TITLE 16 OF THE CODE OF FEDERAL
REGULATIONS RELATING TO COMMERCIAL PRACTICES.
(c) [(1)] “1.4 G fireworks” means common fireworks:

HOUSE BILL 1002 3
(1) designed primarily to produce visible effects by combustion[.];
[(2) “1.4 G fireworks” includes:
(i) small devices containing less than 2 grains of pyrotechnic
composition designed to produce an audible effect;
(ii) Roman candles, not exceeding 10 balls, that have a total
pyrotechnic composition not exceeding 20 grams and inside tube diameter not exceeding
3/8 inch;
(iii) sky rockets with sticks, that have a total pyrotechnic composition
not exceeding 20 grams and an inside tube diameter not exceeding 1/2 inch;
(iv) helicopter–type rockets that have a total pyrotechnic composition
not exceeding 20 grams and an inside tube diameter not exceeding 1/2 inch;
(v) wheels that have a total pyrotechnic composition not exceeding
60 grams for each driver unit or 240 grams for each wheel and an inside tube diameter of
driver units not exceeding 1/2 inch;
(vi) illuminating torches and colored fire in any form that have a total
pyrotechnic composition not exceeding 100 grams each;
(vii) dipped sticks that have a pyrotechnic composition containing any
perchlorate not exceeding 5 grams;
(viii) mines or shells in which the mortar is an integral part, that have
a total pyrotechnic composition not exceeding 40 grams;
(ix) firecrackers or salutes with casings that have a total pyrotechnic
composition not exceeding 2 grains each and external dimensions not exceeding 1 1/2 inches
in length or 1/4 inch in diameter; and
(x) novelties that consist of two or more 1.4 G fireworks.]
(2) THAT MEET THE FEDERAL REGULATIONS FOR 1.4 G FIREWORKS;
AND
(3) THAT COMPLY WITH THE CONSTRUCTION, PERFORMANCE, AND
LABELING REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY
COMMISSION IN TITLE 16 OF THE CODE OF FEDERAL REGULATIONS RELATING TO
COMMERCIAL PRACTICES.
(D) “APA 87–1” MEANS THE AMERICAN PYROTECHNICS ASSOCIATION
STANDARD 87–1: “STANDARD FOR CONSTRUCTION AND APPROVAL FOR

HOUSE BILL 1002
TRANSPORTATION OF FIREWORKS, NOVELTIES, AND THEATRICAL
PYROTECHNICS”, 2001 EDITION, OR ANY SUBSEQUENT EDITION.
(E) “CONSUMER FIREWORKS” MEANS ANY COMBUSTIBLE OR EXPLOSIVE
COMPOSITION OR ANY SUBSTANCE OR COMBINATION OF SUBSTANCES THAT:
(1) IS INTENDED TO PRODUCE VISIBLE OR AUDIBLE EFFECTS BY
COMBUSTION;
(2) IS SUITABLE FOR USE BY THE PUBLIC;
(3) COMPLIES WITH THE CONSTRUCTION, PERFORMANCE,
COMPOSITION, AND LABELING REQUIREMENTS ADOPTED BY THE CONSUMER
PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION IN TITLE 16 OF THE CODE OF FEDERAL
REGULATIONS RELATING TO COMMERCIAL PRACTICES; AND
(4) COMPLIES WITH THE PROVISIONS FOR “CONSUMER FIREWORKS”
AS DEFINED IN APA 87–1 OR ANY SUCCESSOR STANDARD.
(F) (1) “DISPLAY FIREWORKS” MEANS LARGE FIREWORKS TO BE USED
SOLELY BY PROFESSIONAL PYROTECHNICIANS THAT ARE DESIGNED PRIMARILY TO
PRODUCE VISIBLE OR AUDIBLE EFFECTS BY COMBUSTION, DEFLAGRATION, OR
DETONATION.
(2) “DISPLAY FIREWORKS” INCLUDES:
(I) SALUTES THAT CONTAIN MORE THAN 2 GRAINS OR 130
MILLIGRAMS OF EXPLOSIVE MATERIALS;
(II) AERIAL SHELLS CONTAINING MORE THAN 60 GRAMS OF
PYROTECHNIC COMPOSITIONS; AND
(III) OTHER DISPLAY PIECES THAT EXCEED THE LIMITS OF
EXPLOSIVE MATERIALS FOR CLASSIFICATION AS CONSUMER FIREWORKS AND ARE
CLASSIFIED AS FIREWORKS UN0333, UN0334, OR UN0335 UNDER 49 C.F.R. §
172.101, RELATING TO THE PURPOSE AND USE OF THE HAZARDOUS MATERIALS
TABLE.
[(d)] (G) “Explosive composition” means a mixture or substance that, when
ignited, may cause such a generation of highly heated gases that the resulting gaseous
pressures are capable of producing destructive effects on contiguous objects.
[(e)] (H) “Finishing and assembling building” means a structure in which
fireworks are assembled and packed but are not mixed or pressed.

HOUSE BILL 1002 5
[(f)] (I) (1) [“Fireworks” means combustible, implosive or explosive
compositions, substances, combinations of substances, or articles that are prepared to
produce a visible or audible effect by combustion, explosion, implosion, deflagration, or
detonation.
(2)] “Fireworks” includes 1.3 G fireworks, 1.4 G fireworks, [firecrackers,
squibs, rockets, Roman candles, fire balloons, and signal lights] CONSUMER FIREWORKS,
AND DISPLAY FIREWORKS.
[(3)] (2) “Fireworks” does not include:
(i) toy pistols, toy canes, toy guns, or other devices that use paper
caps that contain 0.25 grains or less of explosive composition if the devices are constructed
so that a hand cannot touch the cap when the cap is in place for use;
(ii) toy pistol paper caps that contain less than 0.20 grains of
explosive composition;
(iii) sparklers that do not contain chlorates or perchlorates;
(iv) ground–based sparkling devices that are nonaerial and
nonexplosive, and are labeled in accordance with the requirements of the U.S. Consumer
Product Safety Commission;
(v) paper wrapped snappers that contain less than 0.03 grains of
explosive composition; or
(vi) ash–producing pellets known as “snakes” that do not contain
mercury and are not regulated by the U.S. Department of Transportation.
[(g)] (J) (1) “Fireworks plant” means land and any building on the land used
in connection with the manufacture, packaging, repackaging, or processing of fireworks.
(2) “Fireworks plant” includes a storage building used in connection with
plant operation.
[(h)] (K) “Mixing building” means a building primarily used to mix and blend
pyrotechnic composition other than wet sparkler mixes.
[(i)] (L) “Press building” means a building used primarily for pressing or
loading pyrotechnic composition into tubes or containers.
[(j)] (M) “Pyrotechnic composition” means a chemical mixture that on burning
and without explosion produces visible or brilliant displays, bright lights, or whistles.

HOUSE BILL 1002
[(k)] (N) “Storage building” means a structure in which finished fireworks or
fireworks in any state of processing are stored, but in which processing or manufacturing
is not performed.
10–102.1.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A PERSON
WHO IS AT LEAST 18 YEARS OLD AND MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS TITLE MAY
PURCHASE, POSSESS, AND USE CONSUMER FIREWORKS.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY IGNITE OR DISCHARGE CONSUMER
FIREWORKS:
(1) ON PUBLIC PROPERTY OR ON PRIVATE PROPERTY WITHOUT THE
EXPRESS PERMISSION OF THE OWNER;
(2) WITHIN, INTO, AT, OR FROM A MOTOR VEHICLE, A WATERCRAFT,
AN AIRCRAFT, AN UNMANNED AIRCRAFT SYSTEM, OR A BUILDING;
(3) AT ANOTHER PERSON;
(4) WHILE THE PERSON IS UNDER THE INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL, A
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCE, OR ANOTHER DRUG;
(5) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN ITEMS (6) AND (7) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
WITHIN 300 FEET OF A STRUCTURE;
(6) WITHIN 150 FEET OF AN ANIMAL HOUSING FACILITY OR A FENCED
AREA DESIGNED TO CONFINE LIVESTOCK THAT IS OWNED OR MANAGED BY ANOTHER
PERSON; OR
(7) BETWEEN 150 AND 300 FEET FROM AN ANIMAL HOUSING FACILITY
OR A FENCED AREA DESIGNED TO CONFINE LIVESTOCK THAT IS OWNED OR
MANAGED BY ANOTHER PERSON, UNLESS THE PERSON IGNITING OR DISCHARGING
THE CONSUMER FIREWORKS NOTIFIES THE OWNER OR MANAGER OF THE
LIVESTOCK, IN WRITING, THAT THE PERSON INTENDS TO IGNITE OR DISCHARGE
CONSUMER FIREWORKS IN THAT LOCATION, AT LEAST 72 HOURS BEFORE THE
PERSON IGNITES OR DISCHARGES THE CONSUMER FIREWORKS.
(C) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REGULATE THE SALE,
POSSESSION, OR USE OF ANY OF THE DEVICES LISTED IN § 10–101(I)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COUNTY THAT ADOPTS A LOCAL

HOUSE BILL 1002 7
LAW PROHIBITING THE PURCHASE, POSSESSION, AND USE OF CONSUMER
FIREWORKS IN THE COUNTY.
10–103.
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this section, the State Fire Marshal may
issue a permit to authorize the discharge of DISPLAY fireworks in a place where the
discharge of DISPLAY fireworks is legal.
(b) The State Fire Marshal shall issue a permit to discharge DISPLAY fireworks
only if the State Fire Marshal determines that the proposed discharge of fireworks will:
(1) not endanger health or safety or damage property; and
(2) be supervised by an experienced and qualified person who has
previously secured written authority from the State Fire Marshal to discharge fireworks.
(c) A permit to discharge DISPLAY fireworks:
(1) does not authorize the holder of the permit to possess or discharge
fireworks in violation of an ordinance or regulation of the political subdivision where the
fireworks are to be discharged; and
(2) does not relieve an applicant for a permit from any requirement to
obtain any additional license or authority from the governing body of the political
subdivision where the fireworks are to be discharged.
10–104.
(a) A person must have a permit to discharge DISPLAY fireworks as provided by
this subtitle before the person:
(1) discharges DISPLAY fireworks; or
(2) possesses DISPLAY fireworks with the intent to discharge DISPLAY
fireworks or to allow the discharge of DISPLAY fireworks.
(b) An applicant for a permit to discharge DISPLAY fireworks shall:
(1) apply to the State Fire Marshal for the permit at least 10 days before
the date of discharge;
(2) pay to the State Fire Marshal a permit fee of $50; and
(3) post a bond with the State Fire Marshal in accordance with § 10–105 of
this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1002
(c) If the State Fire Marshal does not receive the application for a permit required
under subsection (b) of this section at least 10 days before the date of the discharge, the
State Fire Marshal shall charge the applicant a late fee of $50 in addition to all required
fees.
(d) The permit fee required under subsection (b)(2) of this section and the late fee
required under subsection (c) of this section do not apply to a volunteer fire department or
volunteer ambulance and rescue company.
(e) A permit to discharge DISPLAY fireworks is nontransferable.
10–109.
The State Fire Prevention Commission shall adopt regulations to carry out this
subtitle.
10–110.
(a) Unless the person holds a permit issued under this subtitle, a person may not:
(1) discharge DISPLAY fireworks; or
(2) possess DISPLAY fireworks:
(i) with intent to discharge or allow the discharge of the DISPLAY
fireworks in violation of this subtitle; or
(ii) for the purpose of disposing or selling the DISPLAY fireworks to
a person for use or discharge without a permit, if a permit is required by this subtitle.
(b) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person may not sell
DISPLAY fireworks to another person without a permit issued under this subtitle.
(2) (i) A person licensed by the State Fire Marshal under Subtitle 2 of
this title may sell or deliver fireworks to a bona fide distributor, jobber, or wholesaler with
a principal place of business in a state where the sale or possession of fireworks is allowed.
(ii) The State Fire Marshal may require a person who is an
out–of–state distributor, jobber, or wholesaler to submit a certificate issued by the person’s
state of operation that demonstrates authority to buy and receive fireworks.
10–111.
(a) A person who possesses or discharges fireworks in violation of this subtitle is
guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $250 for each

HOUSE BILL 1002 9
offense.
(b) A person who sells fireworks in violation of this subtitle is guilty of a
misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not exceeding $1,000 for each offense.
(c) (1) At the expense of the owner, the State Fire Marshal shall seize and
remove all fireworks possessed or sold in violation of this subtitle.
(2) Fireworks described in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be
forfeited and destroyed.
10–114.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (B) AND (C) OF THIS SECTION,
CONSUMER FIREWORKS MAY BE SOLD ONLY FROM A STAND–ALONE PERMANENT
STRUCTURE THAT:
(1) IS LICENSED BY THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL;
(2) HAS A STORAGE AREA THAT IS SEPARATED FROM WHOLESALE OR
RETAIL SALES AREAS TO WHICH A PURCHASER MAY BE ADMITTED BY
APPROPRIATELY RATED FIRE SEPARATION;
(3) IS LOCATED AT LEAST 250 FEET FROM ANY FACILITY THAT
STORES, SELLS, OR DISPENSES GASOLINE, PROPANE, OR OTHER FLAMMABLE
PRODUCTS;
(4) IS LOCATED AT LEAST 1,500 FEET FROM ANY OTHER FACILITY
LICENSED TO SELL CONSUMER FIREWORKS;
(5) HAS A MONITORED BURGLAR AND FIRE ALARM SYSTEM; AND
(6) CONDUCTS QUARTERLY FIRE DRILLS AND PREPLANNING
MEETINGS AS REQUIRED BY THE PRIMARY FIRE DEPARTMENT IN THE JURISDICTION
OF THE FACILITY.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, CONSUMER FIREWORKS MAY BE SOLD FROM A
TEMPORARY STRUCTURE IF THE TEMPORARY STRUCTURE:
(I) IS LICENSED BY THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL;
(II) IS LOCATED AT LEAST 250 FEET FROM ANY FACILITY THAT
STORES, SELLS, OR DISPENSES GASOLINE, PROPANE, OR OTHER FLAMMABLE

HOUSE BILL 1002
PRODUCTS;
(III) HAS AN EVACUATION PLAN POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS
LOCATION FOR A TEMPORARY STRUCTURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH NFPA 1124;
(IV) HAS ANY OUTDOOR STORAGE UNIT SEPARATED FROM THE
WHOLESALE OR RETAIL SALES AREA TO WHICH A PURCHASER MAY BE ADMITTED BY
APPROPRIATELY RATED FIRE SEPARATION;
(V) COMPLIES WITH NFPA 1124 AS IT RELATES TO RETAIL
SALES OF CONSUMER FIREWORKS IN TEMPORARY STRUCTURES;
(VI) IS LOCATED AT LEAST 2 MILES FROM ANY PERMANENT
FACILITY LICENSED TO SELL CONSUMER FIREWORKS;
(VII) DOES NOT EXCEED 2,500 SQUARE FEET;
(VIII) IS SECURED AT ALL TIMES DURING WHICH CONSUMER
FIREWORKS ARE DISPLAYED WITHIN THE STRUCTURE;
(IX) HAS A MINIMUM OF $2,000,000 IN PUBLIC AND PRODUCT
LIABILITY INSURANCE;
(X) HAS A SALES PERIOD LIMITED TO JUNE 15 THROUGH JULY
8 AND DECEMBER 21 THROUGH JANUARY 2 EACH YEAR; AND
(XI) STORES CONSUMER FIREWORKS NOT ON DISPLAY FOR
RETAIL SALE IN AN OUTDOOR STORAGE UNIT.
(2) THE SALE OF CONSUMER FIREWORKS FROM A TEMPORARY
STRUCTURE IS LIMITED TO THE FOLLOWING:
(I) HELICOPTER, AERIAL SPINNER (APA 87–1, 3.1.2.3);
(II) ROMAN CANDLE (APA 87–1, 3.1.2.4); AND
(III) MINE AND SHELL DEVICES NOT EXCEEDING 500 GRAMS.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COUNTY THAT ADOPTS A LOCAL
LAW PROHIBITING THE SALE OF CONSUMER FIREWORKS IN THE COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:

HOUSE BILL 1002 11
Article – Public Safety
1–308.
(a) There is a 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to §
1–309.1 of this subtitle, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund are to:
(i) reimburse counties for the cost of enhancing a 9–1–1 system;
(ii) pay contractors in accordance with § 1–306(b)(12) of this subtitle;
and
(iii) fund the coordinator position and staff to handle the increased
duties related to wireless enhanced 9–1–1 service under § 1–305 of this subtitle, as an
administrative cost.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, in addition to the purposes
described under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the purposes of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund
include funding:
(i) the operation and maintenance of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services, including:
1. equipment and software utilized directly for providing
9–1–1 services by a public safety answering point;
2. protocol systems and software utilized directly for
providing 9–1–1 services by a public safety answering point;
3. interpretation services provided for a public safety
answering point;
4. services provided for a public safety answering point to
ensure improved access to individuals with disabilities and other individuals who use
assistive technology; and
5. voice, data, and call log recorders utilized to capture
information from 9–1–1 systems, enhanced 9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1
services;
(ii) the operation and maintenance of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services connectivity and infrastructure
equipment, including:
1. automatic number and location identification; and

HOUSE BILL 1002
2. Primary Rate Interface and Session Initiation Protocol
trunking for 10–digit emergency and nonemergency lines;
(iii) geographical information systems hardware, software, data
development, and data management costs incurred for the effective operation of 9–1–1
systems, enhanced 9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services, including:
1. mapping equipment;
2. interfaces to computer–aided dispatch; and
3. geographical information systems base layer development
and management;
(iv) public safety answering point facilities costs, including access
control, security systems, and standby power;
(v) costs for public education materials;
(vi) the training of county personnel working in or directly
supporting a public safety answering point;
(vii) the provision of tuition reimbursement for 9–1–1 specialists for
educational programs related to the 9–1–1 specialist career field;
(viii) costs to maintain the cybersecurity of 9–1–1 systems, enhanced
9–1–1 systems, and Next Generation 9–1–1 services;
(ix) costs of 9–1–1 specialist recruitment activities as described in §
1–306(b)(17) of this subtitle; and
(x) costs of telecommunications cardiopulmonary resuscitation
training.
(3) Funding allocated in accordance with paragraph (2) of this subsection
may not be utilized for any purpose associated with the 9–8–8 suicide prevention hotline.
(c) The 9–1–1 Trust Fund consists of:
(1) money from the 9–1–1 fee collected and remitted to the Comptroller
under § 1–310 of this subtitle;
(2) money from the additional charge collected and remitted to the
Comptroller under § 1–311 of this subtitle;
(3) money from the prepaid wireless E 9–1–1 fee collected and remitted to

HOUSE BILL 1002 13
the Comptroller under § 1–313 of this subtitle;
(4) MONEY DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND FROM THE CONSUMER
FIREWORKS TAX UNDER §§ 2–1302.5 AND 11–104 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
and
[(4)] (5) investment earnings of the 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(d) Money in the 9–1–1 Trust Fund shall be held in the State Treasury.
(e) The Secretary shall administer the 9–1–1 Trust Fund, subject to the
guidelines for financial management and budgeting established by the Department of
Budget and Management.
(f) The Secretary shall direct the Comptroller to establish separate accounts in
the 9–1–1 Trust Fund for the payment of administrative expenses and for each county.
(g) (1) Any investment earnings shall be credited to the 9–1–1 Trust Fund.
(2) The Comptroller shall allocate the investment income among the
accounts in the 9–1–1 Trust Fund, prorated on the basis of the total fees collected in each
county.
8–102.
(a) There is a Senator William H. Amoss Fire, Rescue, and Ambulance Fund.
(b) The purposes of the Fund are to promote:
(1) the delivery of effective and high quality fire protection, rescue, and
ambulance services in the State;
(2) increased financial support for fire, rescue, and ambulance companies
by counties; and
(3) the continued financial viability of volunteer fire, rescue, and
ambulance companies given the greatly increased costs of equipment.
(c) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Secretary may adopt
procedures to carry out this subtitle, including additional auditing and reporting
requirements.
(3) The Secretary may not impose training or operational requirements as
a precondition to receipt of money, except as otherwise expressly provided in this subtitle.

HOUSE BILL 1002
(d) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) MONEY DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND FROM THE CONSUMER
FIREWORKS TAX UNDER §§ 2–1302.5 AND 11–104 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
and
[(2)] (3) revenue distributed to the Fund under § 16–609 of the Business
Regulation Article.
(e) (1) As authorized by the Secretary, the Treasurer shall make payments out
of the Fund to each county on warrant of the Comptroller.
(2) The Treasurer shall make the payments required under this subsection
to the appropriate county on or about November 15.
(f) (1) State money provided under this section may only be used to:
(i) acquire or rehabilitate fire or rescue equipment, including
ambulances;
(ii) acquire or rehabilitate capital equipment used in connection with
fire or rescue equipment;
(iii) rehabilitate facilities used primarily to house fire fighting
equipment, ambulances, and rescue vehicles;
(iv) install life safety and fire protection systems at a fire, rescue, or
ambulance facility;
(v) acquire land for the purpose of rehabilitation or construction of a
fire, rescue, or ambulance facility;
(vi) acquire wireless telecommunications devices, computers, and
related computer equipment if used exclusively for fire protection, rescue, and ambulance
services; and
(vii) acquire machinery and equipment if used exclusively for fire
protection, rescue, and ambulance services.
(2) State money provided under this section may not be used:
(i) for administrative costs;
(ii) for compensation or fringe benefits to employees or members of
county governments, or fire, rescue, or ambulance companies;

HOUSE BILL 1002 15
(iii) for travel or meal expenses;
(iv) for fuel, utility, or routine maintenance costs of facilities or
equipment;
(v) to acquire new or replacement fire hydrants or water mains;
(vi) for insurance;
(vii) for fund–raising activities;
(viii) to replace or repair eligible items to the extent that insurance
proceeds are available;
(ix) for costs associated with the “9–1–1” emergency telephone
system; or
(x) for land or interests in land, except as provided in paragraph
(1)(v) of this subsection.
(g) Beginning in fiscal year 2026, the Governor shall include an annual
appropriation to the Fund of at least $16,500,000.
Article – Tax – General
2–1302.5.
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTIONS REQUIRED UNDER §§ 2–1301 THROUGH
2–1302.4 OF THIS SUBTITLE, OF THE SALES AND USE TAX COLLECTED UNDER §
11–104(L) OF THIS ARTICLE FROM THE SALE OF CONSUMER FIREWORKS, AS
DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE, THE COMPTROLLER
QUARTERLY SHALL DISTRIBUTE:
(1) 31% TO THE 9–1–1 TRUST FUND UNDER § 1–308 OF THE PUBLIC
SAFETY ARTICLE;
(2) 31% TO THE SENATOR WILLIAM H. AMOSS FIRE, RESCUE, AND
AMBULANCE FUND UNDER § 8–102 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE; AND
(3) 38% TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
11–104.

HOUSE BILL 1002
(L) THE SALES AND USE TAX RATE FOR CONSUMER FIREWORKS, AS
DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THE PUBLIC SAFETY ARTICLE, IS, FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027
AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER, 16%.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.